Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201676-3305
Additional reclamation costs.

Nothing in the
Oil Pipeline Reclamation Act prohibits a state agency, county board, city
council, or village board from pursuing reclamation costs for the maintenance
and repair of roads, bridges, or other infrastructure related to the construction,
maintenance, or operation of a pipeline by a pipeline carrier who is subject
to the act.

Laws 2011, LB629, § 5.